Tennessee, session 114, HB0169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-2328(a), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Contraceptive" means any device, medication, biological product, or
procedure that is intended for use in the prevention of pregnancy, whether
specifically intended to prevent pregnancy or for other health needs;
(2) "Health benefit plan":
(A) Means a hospital, surgical, or medical expense policy; health,
hospital, or medical service corporation contract; a policy or agreement
entered into by a health insurer, or a health maintenance organization
contract offered by an employer; other plan administered by the state; or
a certificate issued under those policies, contracts, or plans; and
(B) Includes a policy or contract for health insurance coverage
provided under:
(i) The TennCare program administered under the Medical
Assistance Act of 1968, compiled in title 71, chapter 5, part 1, or a
successor medicaid program; or
(ii) The CoverKids Act of 2006, compiled in title 71,
chapter 3, part 11, or a successor program; and
HB0169
001065
- 1 -

(C) Does not include policies or certificates covering only
accident, credit, dental, disability income, long-term care, hospital
indemnity, medicare supplement as defined in § 1882(g)(1) of the Social
Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 1395ss(g)(1)), specified disease, vision care,
other limited benefit health insurance, coverage issued as a supplement
to liability insurance, workers' compensation insurance, automobile
medical payment insurance, or insurance under which benefits are
payable with or without regard to fault and that is statutorily required to be
contained in a liability insurance policy or equivalent self-insurance;
(3) "Health insurance entity" has the same meaning as defined in § 56-7-
109 and includes a managed care organization contracting with the state to
provide insurance through:
(A) The TennCare program administered under the Medical
Assistance Act of 1968, compiled in title 71, chapter 5, part 1, or a
successor medicaid program; or
(B) The CoverKids program administered under the CoverKids
Act of 2006, compiled in title 71, chapter 3, part 11, or a successor
program; and
(4) "Healthcare provider" and "provider" mean a person or entity that
provides healthcare services; is registered, certified, or licensed in accordance
with title 63; and is regulated under the department of health or the division of
health-related boards.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-2328(b), is amended by
deleting "July 1, 2024" and substituting "January 1, 2026".
- 2 - 001065

SECTION 3. This act takes effect on January 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 001065